Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.400.306

Fingerprints accepted by the state patrol—Fingerprints forwarded to the federal bureau of investigation—Conditions.

The state patrol shall accept fingerprints obtained under this chapter only if it can ensure that the patrol will not retain a record of the fingerprints after the check is complete. It shall not forward fingerprints obtained under this chapter to the federal bureau of investigation unless it can ensure that the federal bureau of investigation will not retain a record of the fingerprints after the check is complete.

[ 1995 c 335 s 504; 1992 c 159 s 9.]

NOTES:

Part headings, table of contents not law—1995 c 335: See note following RCW 28A.150.360.

Findings—1992 c 159: See note following RCW 28A.400.303.